Massachusetts, session 194th, H4648.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding section 11 of chapter 21N of the General Laws or any other general or
special law or rule or regulation to the contrary, no conservation restrictions are required as a
condition for receiving state money for the purchase or lease of any interest in land by the
Stockbridge-Munsee Community of the Mohican Nation of 372.550 acres of undeveloped land
known as Fenn Farm located at the northern tip of Monument Mountain in the town of
Stockbridge.
of 1